Utah statutes.
10-3b-402.   Mayor in a five-member council form of government.
(1)  The mayor in a municipality operating under a five-member council form of
municipal government:
(a)  is a regular and voting member of the council;
(b)  is the chair of the council and presides at all council meetings;
(c)  exercises ceremonial functions for the municipality;
(d)  may not veto any ordinance, tax levy, or appropriation passed by the
council; and
(e)  except as modified by ordinance under Subsection 10-3b-403(2), has the
powers and duties described in Section 10-3b-104.
(2) (a)  If the mayor is absent or unable or refuses to act, the council may
elect a member of the council as mayor pro tempore, to:
(i)  preside at a council meeting; and
(ii)  perform, during the mayor's absence, disability, or refusal to act, the
duties and functions of mayor.
(b)  The municipal clerk or recorder shall enter in the minutes of the council
meeting the election of a council member as mayor pro tempore under Subsection
(2)(a).
